Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1150
Dental Health Director; qualifications.

The Dental Health Director shall be a graduate of an accredited school or college of dentistry and shall be licensed by the State of Nebraska to practice dentistry in Nebraska or duly licensed to practice dentistry in some other state of the United States of America.

Laws 1949, c. 201, § 2, p. 584;

Laws 1953, c. 240, § 1, p. 829;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 83;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-193.02;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 483.